Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 7

Construction and Maintenance by Districts

69-5-701. Contracts for improvements.

No contracts for improvements to be done in a drainage or levee district shall be made until after the commissioners have made their inspection, classification, and apportionment as directed in §§69-5-301 —69-5-312, nor until the question of classification and apportionment and assessment of benefits has been determined and settled by the court; but after the commissioners and the court have so acted, then such contracts may be made by the board of directors of the district.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 19; Shan., § 3871a82; Code 1932, § 4310; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1207; T.C.A. §69-6-701.

69-5-702. Notice of work.

Before entering into any contract for improvements, the board of directors of the improvement district shall cause notice to be given once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks in some newspaper published in the county where the improvement is located, and such additional publication elsewhere as it may direct of the time and place of letting the work of construction of the improvement, and in the notice it shall specify the approximate amount of work to be done in each section, and the time fixed for its commencement and completion.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 19; Shan., § 3871a83; Code 1932, § 4311; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1208; T.C.A. §69-6-702.

69-5-703. Contracts let to lowest bidders — Rejection of bids and readvertisement.

The board of directors shall award contract or contracts for each section of the work to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders for the contract, or it may award the contract as a whole to the lowest responsible bidder, exercising its own discretion as to letting the work as a whole or in sections, and reserving the right to reject any and all bids and readvertise the letting of the work.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 19; Shan., § 3871a84; Code 1932, § 4312; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1209; T.C.A. §69-6-703.

69-5-704. Deposits by bidders.

Each person bidding for such work shall deposit with the treasurer of the board of directors in cash or certified check a sum equal to ten percent (10%) of the amount of the bid, not in any event, however, to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or file a solvent bond for that amount conditioned to execute the contract if entered into. The deposit or bond shall be returned to the person if the bid is not successful; if the bid is successful, the deposit or bond shall be retained as a guarantee only of the person's good faith in entering on the contract.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 19; Shan., § 3871a85; Acts 1921, ch. 144, § 2; mod. Code 1932, § 4313; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1210; T.C.A. §69-6-704.

69-5-705. Bond or deposit of contractor — Return of bid deposit.

The successful bidder shall be required to execute a bond, with sufficient corporate surety or personal sureties, payable to the county, for the use and benefit of the district, in an amount equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the estimated cost of the work so let, or may deposit such amount in cash with the treasurer of the board of directors as security for the performance of the contract, and upon the execution of such bond or the making of such deposit, the deposit originally made with the bid shall be returned to the bidder.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 19; Shan., § 3871a86; Code 1932, § 4314; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1211; T.C.A. §69-6-705.

69-5-706. Forfeiture of deposit and action for breach of contract.

If any person to whom the work, or any portion of the work, in an improvement district has been let fails to perform the work according to the terms specified in the contract, then the cash deposited by the person shall be forfeited for the benefit of such district and be paid into its fund; or if bond has been given by the contracting party so failing, then recovery of the damages sustained may be had by suit in the name of the payee in such bond for the use of the district, and the damage on judgment for the damages collected and paid into the fund of the district.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 37; Shan., § 3871a145; Code 1932, § 4380; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1212; T.C.A. §69-6-706.

69-5-707. Engineer.

The board of directors shall employ a competent engineer to take charge and supervision of the construction of such improvement work, contracting with the engineer for compensation for services in such sum or at such rate as may be agreed upon, and to be paid as other expenses of such district. The directors may remove such engineer and contract with another, if they see fit for any reason.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, §§ 20, 36; Shan., §§ 3871a87, 3871a137; Code 1932, §§ 4315, 4372; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1213; T.C.A. §69-6-707.

Cross-References. Salary and expenses, §69-5-115.

69-5-708. Bond of engineer.

The board of directors shall require the engineer to give bond, in such sum as it may deem proper, for the faithful performance of duties, such bond to be payable to the county or state, for the use of the improvement district, and filed with the county clerk and recorded in the drainage record.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 20; Shan., § 3871a92; Code 1932, § 4320; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1214; T.C.A. §69-6-708.

69-5-709. Monthly estimates of work and payments thereon.

The engineer in charge of the construction shall furnish the contractor monthly estimates of the amount of work done on each section, and upon filing the estimates with the county clerk, the county mayor shall draw a warrant in favor of such contractor for eighty percent (80%) of the value of the work done according to the estimate.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 20; Shan., § 3871a89; Code 1932, § 4317; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1215; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-709.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-710. Warrant for balance due upon completion of work.

When the work is completed to the satisfaction of the board of directors and the engineer, and so certified by the engineer and the board, and such certificate is filed with the county clerk, then the county mayor shall draw a warrant in favor of the contractor for the balance due.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 20; Shan., § 3871a90; Code 1932, § 4318; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1216; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-710.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-711. Warrants — Manner of drawing and payment.

All warrants shall be drawn upon the county trustee as ordinary county warrants are drawn, but shall be payable only out of the fund provided for the district, and shall so state upon their face.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 20; Shan., § 3871a91; Code 1932, § 4319; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1217; T.C.A. §69-6-711.

69-5-712. Drainage overseer.

After the main improvement in any drainage district, or drainage and levee district, has been completed, the board of directors, if it deems necessary for the protection of the district, and for the proper maintenance of the efficiency of the improvement, may employ a competent person to look after and take care of the same. The person so employed shall be designated “drainage overseer.” The board of directors shall define the duties of the drainage overseer, and contract with the drainage overseer to perform the prescribed duties, and contract for the amount to be paid the drainage overseer for such services. The board of directors has the right, at any time, to discharge the drainage overseer and employ another whenever, in its judgment, it is to the best interest of the district that it be done. The compensation of the drainage overseer shall be paid out of any funds in the district, not needed for the payment of bonds and interest maturing, and other improvements that are to be made, during the year. The payment will be made as is provided for other payments under the drainage law.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 3; Shan., § 3871a88; Code 1932, § 4316; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1218; T.C.A. §69-6-712.

69-5-713. Bridges built by county across public highway.

Whenever the making of an improvement across a public highway necessitates the building of a bridge over the highway, the county shall build and construct the same and pay all costs of the bridge out of the county bridge fund, if such a fund is provided, and, if not, out of the general county fund.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 22; Shan., § 3871a94; Code 1932, § 4322; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1219; T.C.A. §69-6-713.

69-5-714. Use of ditch or watercourse by assessed landowner.

The owner of any land or lot that has been assessed for the payment of the cost of the location and construction of any ditch, drain, or watercourse shall have the right to use it as an outlet for lateral drains from the land or lot.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 23; Shan., § 3871a95; Code 1932, § 4323; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1220; T.C.A. §69-6-714.

69-5-715. Use by landowner subject to control of district directors.

The drainage district, or drainage and levee district, or the directors thereof, has the right to control the manner in which lateral drains are emptied into the main ditch, drain, or watercourse, in order to prevent such main ditch or drain from being filled or blocked by silt or sand, brought in by such lateral drains.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 9; Shan., § 3871a96; Code 1932, § 4324; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1221; T.C.A. §69-6-715.

69-5-716. Control of discharge of creek or branch into main ditch or drain.

The district, or the directors thereof, have a like right to control the manner in which any creek or branch shall empty or be emptied into the main ditch, drain, or watercourse, in order to prevent such from being filled or blocked by silt or sand, brought in by such creek or branch.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 9; Shan., § 3871a97; Code 1932, § 4325; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1222; T.C.A. §69-6-716.

69-5-717. Application by owner to use ditch or drain — Designation of use.

An owner desiring to exercise the right to use the ditch, drain, or watercourse, as an outlet for lateral drain or drains, before doing so, shall make application to the board of directors of the district in which the land is situated, to designate the place and manner in which the lateral shall cross the right-of-way, and empty into the ditch, drain, or watercourse. Upon such application being made, it shall be the duty of the board of directors to investigate the matter and make such designation. It is unlawful for any landowner to make any ditch or lateral, upon and across the right-of-way, and into the main ditch, drain, or watercourse, otherwise than as designated by the board of directors. It is unlawful for any landowner to cut any lateral, ditch, or drain, and stop the same at or near the margin of the right-of-way of the district, so as to empty water into and upon the right-of-way, except by the written consent of the board of directors of the district.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 6; Shan., § 3871a98; Code 1932, § 4326; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1223; T.C.A. §69-6-717.

69-5-718. Location of lateral drains — Determination by board and fixing of damages.

If a controversy arises among any of the landowners, as to the location or character of any lateral drain or ditch between or across the lands of such owners, any one (1) or more of such landowners may, by petition, make application to the board to locate the ditch or drain and determine its character. Such petition shall set out with reasonable certainty the matters in controversy; and upon the petition being filed, it shall be the duty of the board of directors to fix a day for going upon the premises to determine the same. Five (5) days' notice of the time and place shall be given to the other parties interested who are not petitioners. On the day fixed, it shall be the duty of the board of directors to go upon the premises and examine the premises; and if in their judgment, a ditch, drain, or lateral should be made, in order to give the landowners the proper means in draining their low and wet lands and reaching the main improvements, they will locate the place for the lateral, drain, or ditch, determine the character of the same, and fix the amount of damages, if any, to be paid, and direct the petitioner or petitioners to proceed and make the ditch, drain, or lateral.

The board of directors shall set out in writing the action taken, and spread it upon the minutes of the board of directors, and file the original paper with the other papers of the board.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 6; Shan., §§ 3871a99, 3871a100; Code 1932, §§ 4327, 4328; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-1224, 70-1225; T.C.A. §69-6-718.

69-5-719. Damages a lien on land — Enforcement of lien.

The damages assessed shall be a lien upon tracts of land in the district of the owner or owners respectively affected by the improvement, against whom the damages are assessed, but this lien shall be inferior to the lien of the general assessment, which lien shall be enforced by a bill or petition in the county court of the county in which the land is situated.

Jurisdiction is conferred upon the county courts to enforce such liens.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 6; Shan., § 3871a101; Code 1932, § 4329; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1226; T.C.A. §69-6-719.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-720. Appeal from action of directors to circuit court — Bonds.

Any landowner against whom such damages have been assessed, or who is aggrieved by the action of the board of directors, shall have the right to appeal from the action of the board of directors to the next term of the circuit court, upon giving bond in double the amount of the damages assessed, and a cost bond of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), and the case shall stand for trial in the circuit court, at the first term after the papers have been filed.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 6; Shan., § 3871a102; Code 1932, § 4330; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1227; T.C.A. §69-6-720.

69-5-721. Continuation of work pending appeal.

If the appeal is only as to the matter of damages, the work of constructing the laterals, ditch, or drain shall not be delayed by the appeal; provided, that the other parties interested make a bond payable to the state of Tennessee for the use and benefit of the parties appealing, in an amount double the damages assessed and fixed by the board of directors.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 6; Shan., § 3871a103; Code 1932, § 431; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1228; T.C.A. §69-6-721.

69-5-722. Collection of assessments — Separate fund.

The assessment shall be collected by the county trustee as county taxes are collected, except as provided in this section, and the funds so collected shall be kept as a separate fund, and shall be paid out only for purposes properly connected with such improvement on the order or warrant of the county mayor; provided, that such assessments may be collected in chancery, as provided in part 8 of this chapter, and no personal property of the owner of land so assessed shall be liable or distrained for such assessment, but the land so assessed only shall be liable for such assessment.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 24; Shan., § 3871a104; Code 1932, § 4332; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1229; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-722.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Compensation for collecting and paying out assessments and for certified statements, §69-5-835.

69-5-723. Improvements may be limited to what parties desire.

The improvement in the drainage districts provided for in this chapter may consist solely, if so desired by those concerned, in the changing in whole or in part of the course or channel of a natural watercourse, or in straightening, as far as practicable, such watercourse and cleaning out so much of its natural channel as it is desired to utilize; or the improvement in such drainage district may, in addition to the main ditch, or drain, or channel, include such other lateral and other ditches and levees as may be deemed proper or necessary.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 25; Shan., § 3871a105; Code 1932, § 4333; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1230; T.C.A. §69-6-723.

69-5-724. Unlawful to injure ditches, canals, or other improvements.

It is unlawful for any person, or corporation, in any way, to injure, damage, or obstruct the rights-of-way, ditches, canals, or other improvements of any drainage district, levee district, and drainage and levee district in the state.

Any person or corporation that violates subsection (a) commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1915, ch. 84, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 3871a157, 3871a158; Code 1932, §§ 4392, 4393; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-1231, 70-1232; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; T.C.A. §69-6-724.

Cross-References. Damage to or travel on levees, penalties, §39-14-408.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.